zh-CN: 喷丝配方类型: 持久; 可水洗; 抗水; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta formulacije spreja niz: Dugotrajno; Perivo; Vodootporno; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta sestave nitk v razpršilu: Dolgoobstojno; Pralno; Vodoodporno; Drugo
vi: Loại công thức dây phun: Lâu trôi; Có thể rửa sạch; Chống nước; Khác
en: Spray string formulation type: Long-lasting; Washable; Water-resistant; Other
nl: Serpentinespray formuleringstype: Langdurig; Afwasbaar; Waterbestendig; Overige
ru: Тип состава аэрозольной нити: Стойкий; Смываемый; Водостойкий; Другой
ro-RO: Tip de formulare a sprayului cu spumă: De lungă durată; Lavabil; Rezistent la apă; Altele
tr: Sprey ip formülasyon tipi: Uzun süre kalıcı; Yıkanabilir; Suya dayanıklı; Diğer
it: Formulazione della schiuma filante spray: A lunga durata; Lavabile; Resistente all’acqua; Altro
da: Formuleringstype for sprayserpentiner: Langtidsholdbar; Vaskbar; Vandafvisende; Andet
pt-BR: Serpentina em spray tipo de formulação: Longa duração; Lavável; Resistente à água; Outro
es: Tipo de formulación del aerosol de serpentinas: Larga duración; Lavable; Resistente al agua; Otro
hu: Szerpentin spray összetételének típusa: Hosszan tartó; Lemosható; Vízlepergető; Egyéb
fr: Type de formulation de la bombe à serpentins: Longue durée; Lavable; Résistant à l’eau; Autre
zh-TW: 噴彩罐配方類型: 長效; 可水洗; 防潑水; 其他
de: Eigenschaften der Sprühschlangen: Langanhaltend; Abwaschbar; Wasserfest; Sonstige
ko: 스프레이 스트링 배합 유형: 오래 지속됨; 워셔블; 내수성; 기타
pl: Rodzaj składu serpentyny w sprayu: Długotrwałe; Zmywalne; Wodoodporne; Inne
th: ประเภทของสเปรย์ฉีดผม: ติดทนนาน; ล้างออกได้; ทนน้ำ; อื่นๆ
nb: Formuleringstype for spraystreng: Langvarig; Vaskbar; Vannbestandig; Annet
sv: Typ av formulering för spraysträng: Långvarig; Tvättbar; Vattenavvisande; Övrigt
ja: スプレーストリング配合タイプ: 長持ち; 水洗い可能; 耐水性; その他
fi: Serpentiinisprayn toimintatyyppi: Pitkäkestoinen; Pestävä; Vedenkestävä; Muu
lt-LT: Purškiamų siūlų formulės tipas: Ilgai išliekantis; Nuplaunamas; Atsparus vandeniui; Kita
el: Τύπος σύνθεσης σπρέι σερπαντίνας: Μεγάλης διάρκειας; Πλενόμενο; Αδιάβροχο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de formulação do fio de spray: De longa duração; Lavável; Resistente à água; Outro
cs: Typ složení provázku ve ve spreji: Dlouhotrvající; Omyvatelný; Voděodolný; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ zloženia spreja: Dlhotrvajúce; Umývateľné; Vodoodolné; Iné
bg-BG: Тип формула на парти спрей нишките: Дълготраен; Миещ се; Водоустойчив; Друго